dev/conversion/adj.chopped.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="बालक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="जड__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ऐसी/आ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कुछ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="स/ा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="फी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कई/अ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="दुनाली"><i>दुनाली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बकाया"><i>बकाय</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनाश्रय"><i>अनाश्रय</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अभागीआ"><i>अभागी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उतनी"><i>उतनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नवसिखा"><i>नवसिख</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अयोनिअ"><i>अयोनि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वाक्प्रसारीआ"><i>वाक्प्रसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संस्तुत"><i>संस्तुत</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सगुणी"><i>सगुणी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हीनभावना"><i>हीनभावन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुहारिअ"><i>अनुहारि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुनयीआ"><i>अनुनयी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घोलक"><i>घोलक</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फलाँअ"><i>फलाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फुसफुसा"><i>फुसफुस</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ताजीआ"><i>ताजी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="द्रोही"><i>द्रोही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उपहित"><i>उपहित</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शान्तिकारी"><i>शान्तिकारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="परकटा"><i>परकट</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडभागीआ"><i>बडभागी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कलमुहाँअ"><i>कलमुहाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विगृहीत"><i>विगृहीत</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आग्रही"><i>आग्रही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हलका"><i>हलक</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सूखीआ"><i>सूखी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दंगली"><i>दंगली</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अफल"><i>अफल</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुसारीआ"><i>अनुसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हैवानी"><i>हैवानी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गुंजायमान"><i>गुंजायमान</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घना"><i>घन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमूर्तिअ"><i>अमूर्ति</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडीआ"><i>बडी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अस्निग्ध"><i>अस्निग्ध</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अणुवादी"><i>अणुवादी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अकेला"><i>अकेल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छमछम"><i>छमछम</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उन्मादीआ"><i>उन्मादी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मृदंगी"><i>मृदंगी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुण्यश्लोक"><i>पुण्यश्लोक</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पवित्रात्मा"><i>पवित्रात्म</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="परितापी"><i>परितापी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जैसीआ"><i>जैसी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="समाजबहिष्कृत"><i>समाजबहिष्कृत</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शतवार्षिकी"><i>शतवार्षिकी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नितांत"><i>नितांत</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="समालंबीआ"><i>समालंबी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चौतरफा"><i>चौतरफ</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कांक्षित"><i>कांक्षित</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमोघदृष्टिअ"><i>अमोघदृष्टि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बूडीआ"><i>बूडी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अपतिअ"><i>अपति</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अश्वारूढ"><i>अश्वारूढ</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बलादवतरित"><i>बलादवतरित</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लुढकनी"><i>लुढकनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नकचढा"><i>नकचढ</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनदेखीआ"><i>अनदेखी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पायुअ"><i>अल्पायु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शक्त"><i>शक्त</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अल्पबुद्धिअ"><i>अल्पबुद्धि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हडबडिया"><i>हडबडिय</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बौनीआ"><i>बौनी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निरुपयोगी"><i>निरुपयोगी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्णनीय"><i>वर्णनीय</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमेधा"><i>अमेध</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनसुनीआ"><i>अनसुनी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उठल्लूआ"><i>उठल्लू</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कईअ"><i>कई</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अव्यवसायी"><i>अव्यवसायी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नाजुकमिजाज"><i>नाजुकमिजाज</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अधजला"><i>अधजल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कैसीआ"><i>कैसी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्रह्मयोनिअ"><i>ब्रह्मयोनि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अमृत्युअ"><i>अमृत्यु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संजीदा"><i>संजीद</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कलही"><i>कलही</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मुखरित"><i>मुखरित</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सूनीआ"><i>सूनी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पचपचा"><i>पचपच</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मेधाविनी"><i>मेधाविनी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संज्ञक"><i>संज्ञक</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बालक"><i>बालक</i><par n="बालक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अलगाऊअ"><i>अलगाऊ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फलाँफलाँअ"><i>फलाँफलाँ</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्जुनच्छविअ"><i>अर्जुनच्छवि</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सूना"><i>सून</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मंगलकारी"><i>मंगलकारी</i><par n="फी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अप्रभुअ"><i>अप्रभु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछ"><i>कुछ</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अवस्तुअ"><i>अवस्तु</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="असंसारीआ"><i>असंसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बाजरूअ"><i>बाजरू</i><par n="कई/अ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अतिक्रूर"><i>अतिक्रूर</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बूडा"><i>बूड</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
